Arkansas, session 2025, SB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-38-503 is amended to read as follows:
4-38-503. Charging order.
(a) On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment
creditor of a member, or transferee, or any other owner of a membership
interest in a limited liability company, the a court having jurisdiction may
charge the transferable membership interest of the judgment debtor with
payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. A charging
order constitutes a lien on a judgment debtor's transferable interest and
requires the limited liability company to pay over to the person to which the
charging order was issued any distribution that otherwise would be paid to
the judgment creditor.
(b) On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment
creditor of a member or transferee against whose transferable interest a
charging order was issued, and a showing to the satisfaction of the court
*ANS294*
03-12-2025 14:07:35 ANS294

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 SB319
that one (1) or more members of the limited liability company have engaged in
bad faith or intentional misconduct in managing the limited liability
company's operations or finances so as to reduce or eliminate distributions
to the judgment debtor, and thereby effectively defeat the charging order,
the court may foreclose the lien and order the sale of the judgment debtor's
transferrable interest. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the
purchaser at the foreclosure sale obtains only the transferable interest,
does not thereby become a member, and is subject to § 4-38-502. At any time
before foreclosure under this subsection (b), the member or transferee whose
transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subsection (a) may
extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a
certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging
order. At any time before foreclosure under this subsection (b), a limited
liability company or one (1) or more members whose transferable interests are
not subject to the charging order may pay to the judgment creditor the full
amount due under the judgment and thereby succeed to the rights of the
judgment creditor, including the charging order If a court charges a
membership interest with payment of a judgment as provided under subsection
(a) of this section, the judgment creditor has only the right to receive a
distribution to which the judgment debtor would otherwise be entitled in
respect of the membership interest.
(c)(1) On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a
judgment creditor of the sole member of a limited liability company against
whose transferable interest a charging order was issued, and a showing to the
satisfaction of the court that distributions under a charging order will not
pay the judgment debt within a reasonable time, the court may foreclose the
lien and order the sale of the transferable interest. If a court orders
foreclosure of a charging order lien against the sole member of a limited
liability company:
(1) the court shall confirm the sale;
(2) the purchaser at the sale obtains the member's entire
interest, not only the member's transferable interest;
(3) the purchaser thereby becomes a member; and
(4) the person whose interest was subject to the foreclosed
charging order is dissociated as a member A charging order constitutes a lien
on the judgment debtor's membership interest.
03-12-2025 14:07:35 ANS294

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 SB319
(2) The charging order lien shall not be foreclosed on under
this subchapter or any other law.
(d) This section:
(1)(A) Is specific to a lien created by a charging order; or
(2) Shall not:
(A) Apply to a creditor's secured lien created under the
Uniform Commercial Code; or
(B) operate Operate to invalidate any provision of any
written agreement between a member and a creditor, including without
limitation a security agreement, assignment, pledge, hypothecation, or other
instrument giving the creditor a security interest in, or assignment of, the
transferable interest, where at the time the written agreement, security
agreement, assignment, or other instrument was executed by the member and the
creditor, the member's executing such written agreement, security agreement,
assignment, or other instrument did not violate a provision of the limited
liability company's certificate of organization or operating agreement.
(B) Except as provided in subsection (c), the foreclosure of a
charging order does not grant the creditor who receives the transferable
interest any rights in the transferable interest beyond the rights of a
transferee;
(2)(A) Provides the exclusive remedy by which a judgment
creditor of a member or a transferee of a member may satisfy a judgment out
of the member's interest in the limited liability company, where the limited
liability company has more than one (1) member.
(B)(i) In the case of a limited liability company with
more than one (1) member, other remedies, including without limitation
foreclosure on the member's interest, except as provided in subsection (b),
or a court order for directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor or
member might have made, are not available to the judgment creditor attempting
to satisfy the judgment out of the judgment debtor's transferable interest in
the limited liability company; and
(3) Does not deprive a member of the benefit of any exemption
applicable to his or her interest.
(e) The entry of a charging order is the exclusive remedy by which a
judgment creditor of a member or of another owner of a membership interest
may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor's membership interest.
03-12-2025 14:07:35 ANS294

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 SB319
(f) This section shall not be construed to deprive a member of a
limited liability company or another owner of a membership interest in a
limited liability company of the benefit of an exemption applicable to the
membership interest of the member or owner.
(g) A creditor of a member or of another owner of a membership
interest does not have the right to obtain possession of or otherwise
exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to the property of the
limited liability company.
(h) This section applies to:
(1) A single-member limited liability company; and
(2) A multiple-member limited liability company.

/s/J. Boyd























03-12-2025 14:07:35 ANS294